adj/adj-irr.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Irregular adjectives
! Author: Daniel Hegglin
! Modifications: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013

Multichar_Symbols +Adj +Masc +Fem +Sg +Pl +Sup +Comp +Apo

LEXICON Root
! agen/atgna
		agen:agen					MASC_SINGULAR;
		agen:agens					MASC_PLURAL;
		agen:atgna					FEM_SINGULAR;
		agen:atgnas					FEM_PLURAL;
		agen:atgn					SUPERLATIVE;
! mez/mesa
		mez:mez						MASC_SINGULAR;
		mez:mezs					MASC_PLURAL;
		mez:mesa					FEM_SINGULAR;
		mez:mesas					FEM_PLURAL;
		mez:mes						SUPERLATIVE;
! lartg/largia
		lartg:lartg					MASC_SINGULAR;
		lartg:lartgs				MASC_PLURAL;
		lartg:largia				FEM_SINGULAR;
		lartg:largias				FEM_PLURAL;
		lartg:larg					SUPERLATIVE;
! apostrophated feminie forms
		bun:bun'					FEM_SG_APOSTROPHATED;
		mal:mal'					FEM_SG_APOSTROPHATED;
		bel:bell'					FEM_SG_APOSTROPHATED;
		trid:trid'					FEM_SG_APOSTROPHATED;
		nausch:nausch'				FEM_SG_APOSTROPHATED;
		mez:mes'					FEM_SG_APOSTROPHATED;
		agen:atgn'					FEM_SG_APOSTROPHATED;
		aut:aut'					FEM_SG_APOSTROPHATED;
		
LEXICON MASC_SINGULAR
		+Adj+Masc+Sg:0				#;
		
LEXICON FEM_SINGULAR	
		+Adj+Fem+Sg:0				#;
		
LEXICON MASC_PLURAL
		+Adj+Masc+Pl:0				#;

LEXICON FEM_PLURAL
		+Adj+Fem+Pl:0				#;

LEXICON SUPERLATIVE
		+Adj+Sup+Masc+Sg:ischem		#;
		+Adj+Sup+Masc+Pl:ischems	#;
		+Adj+Sup+Fem+Sg:ischma		#;
		+Adj+Sup+Fem+Pl:ischmas		#;

LEXICON FEM_SG_APOSTROPHATED
		+Adj+Fem+Sg+Apo:0				#;
